Utah statutes.
49-14-501.   Death of active member in Division A -- Payment of benefits.
(1)  If an active member of this system enrolled in Division A under Section
49-14-301 dies, benefits are payable as follows:
(a)  If the death is classified by the office as a line-of-duty death, the
spouse at the time of death shall receive a lump sum of $1,000 and an
allowance equal to 30% of the deceased member's final average monthly salary.
(b)  If the death is not classified by the office as a line-of-duty death,
benefits are payable as follows:
(i)  If the member has accrued less than ten years of public safety service
credit, the beneficiary shall receive the sum of $1,000 or a refund of the
member's member contributions, whichever is greater.
(ii)  If the member has accrued ten or more years of public safety service
credit at the time of death, the spouse at the time of death shall receive the
sum of $500, plus an allowance equal to 2% of the member's final average
monthly salary for each year of service credit accrued by the member up to a
maximum of 30% of the member's final average monthly salary.
(2)  Benefits are not payable to minor children of members covered under
Division A.
(3)  If a benefit is not distributed under this section, and the member has
designated a beneficiary, the member's member contributions shall be paid to
the beneficiary.
